Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 12

Volunteer Corporate Credit Union

45-4-1201. Corporation created — Articles of incorporation.

There is created the volunteer corporate credit union, a nonprofit membership public corporation, sometimes referred to as “the corporation” in this part.

The corporation shall begin operations at any time within three (3) months after March 26, 1981, upon the adoption of articles of incorporation by the duly authorized representatives of not less than fifteen (15) credit unions chartered and existing under the laws of Tennessee. The articles of incorporation shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner, shall be filed with the secretary of state and with the commissioner of financial institutions, and shall be recorded in the register's office of Hamilton County.

Acts 1981, ch. 76, § 1; 1983, ch. 94, § 1; impl. am. 1983, ch. 216, §§ 1-9.

Compiler's Notes. Miscellaneous provisions concerning credit unions, formerly compiled as §§45-4-1201 —45-4-1204, have been transferred to §§45-4-1901 —45-4-1904, respectively.

Cross-References. Investment in volunteer corporate credit union, §45-4-501.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-4-1202. Purposes.

The general purposes of the corporation are to:

Aid and assist its member credit unions in providing needed service functions;

Provide a source for liquidity management;

Provide financial, custodial and related services for credit unions; associations of credit unions; and corporations, organizations or agencies owned or operated by a credit union or credit unions; and

Provide management for mergers and joint ventures and for other credit unions.

Acts 1981, ch. 76, § 2; 1984, ch. 714, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of former section, see Compiler's Notes under §45-4-1201.

45-4-1203. Powers.

The corporation may:

Enter into contracts of any nature;

Sue and be sued;

Adopt, use and display a corporate seal;

Receive the payment from its members for members' shares, members' deposits, special accounts and certificates;

Make loans to credit unions, associations of credit unions, and corporations, organizations, or agencies owned or operated by a credit union or credit unions;

Receive money or other property from credit unions, associations of credit unions, and corporations, organizations, or agencies owned or operated by a credit union or credit unions;

Invest its funds, not otherwise required for lending to its members, in the following manner:

In any legally chartered bank or trust company supervised by a state or federal bank regulatory agency;

In any state or federal savings and loan association or corporation;

In any agency or association organized either as a stock company, mutual association, or membership corporation; provided, that the membership or stockholders, as the case may be, of the agency or association are restricted to credit unions, or organizations of credit unions; and provided further, that the purposes for which the agency or association is organized are designed to service or otherwise assist credit union operations;

In obligations of or securities fully guaranteed as to principal and interest for the government of the United States or of the state of Tennessee;

In any bonds or other obligations issued by the Tennessee valley authority pursuant to the Tennessee Valley Authority Act of 1933 (16 U.S.C. §§ 831-831dd);

In investments authorized under § 35-3-120, and in any investment that is lawful for federal credit unions chartered under U.S.C., title 12;

In obligations permitted for state banks under § 45-2-607(a)(4) and (a)(5); and

In other investments not specifically enumerated in this subdivision (7) that may be permitted by rule or regulation of the commissioner;

Borrow money from any source upon terms and conditions that the directors determine. The corporation shall not be subject to the limitations of § 45-4-502(a);

Purchase in its own name, hold and convey property of any nature;

Receive by assignment or purchase, from its member credit unions, any property of any nature owned by those member credit unions;

Sell, assign, mortgage, encumber or transfer property of any nature;

Adopt and amend bylaws for carrying out the purposes of this section;

Extend to each member credit union discounts, advancements and accommodations that may be safe and reasonably made with due regard for the claims and demands of other member credit unions and the maintenance of sound credit conditions. It may further prescribe standards for defining the conditions under which discounts, advancements and accommodations may be extended to member credit unions;

Manage and operate other credit unions; and

Undertake other activities, not inconsistent with this part, that the bylaws may provide.

Acts 1981, ch. 76, § 3; 1984, ch. 714, § 3; 1986, ch. 558, § 5; 1995, ch. 23, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of former section, see Compiler's Notes under §45-4-1201.

45-4-1204. Use of name exclusive.

This corporation shall have the sole right to use the names “volunteer state corporate central credit union,” “Volunteer Corporate Credit Union” and “VolCorp.”

Acts 1981, ch. 76, § 4; 1995, ch. 23, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of former section, see Compiler's Notes under §45-4-1201.

45-4-1205. Amendments to articles of incorporation.

Amendments to the articles, adopted by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the number of member credit unions who own shares, shall be filed with the commissioner, and if the commissioner approves the amendments, shall become effective upon being filed in the same manner as the original articles.

Acts 1981, ch. 76, § 5; 1995, ch. 23, § 3.

45-4-1206. Bylaws.

The credit unions that adopt the articles of incorporation under § 45-4-1201 shall also subscribe and submit to the commissioner for approval the initial bylaws under which the corporation shall operate.

The bylaws may be amended at any regular meeting of the directors, or at a special meeting of the directors called for that purpose by vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the entire board.

Acts 1981, ch. 76, § 6.

45-4-1207. Membership — State credit unions, federal credit unions and foreign credit unions.

Any credit union legally chartered under federal law or chartered under the laws of any state may become a member of the corporation, in accordance with provisions of this part and the bylaws, rules and regulations adopted for carrying out the purposes of this part.

Acts 1981, ch. 76, § 7; 1995, ch. 23, § 4.

45-4-1208. Primary shares — Dividends — Withdrawing credit unions.

On July 1, 1995, primary shares of the corporation shall automatically be converted to membership shares of the corporation.

Acts 1981, ch. 76, § 8; 1983, ch. 94, §§ 2, 3; impl. am. 1983, ch. 216, §§ 1-9; 1987, ch. 100, § 4; 1995, ch. 23, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-4-1209. Directors.

The corporation's business shall be conducted by the directors, who shall be elected pursuant to the terms, conditions and provisions of the corporation's bylaws.

Acts 1981, ch. 76, § 9; 1985, ch. 16, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 558, § 5; 1995, ch. 23, § 6.

45-4-1210. Supervision by commissioner of financial institutions — Fee.

The corporation is declared to be performing the functions of a credit union and shall be subject to exclusive supervision and an annual examination by the commissioner of financial institutions.

The corporation shall pay an annual supervision fee equal in amount to one-half (½) of the fee calculated to be due in accordance with § 45-4-1002(c) from a noncorporate credit union having assets equal in amount to the corporation.

Acts 1981, ch. 76, § 10; 1984, ch. 714, § 4; 2015, ch. 241, § 2.

45-4-1211. Tax status of corporation — Status of its bonds and other obligations.

The corporation and all properties at any time owned by it, with the exception of real estate properties, and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in this state.

Also, for the purposes of the Tennessee Securities Act of 1980, compiled in title 48, chapter 1, part 1, and any amendment thereto or substitution therefor, notes, bonds, debentures and other obligations issued by the corporation shall be deemed to be securities issued by a state-chartered credit union as more specifically defined in § 48-1-103(a)(5).

Acts 1981, ch. 76, § 11.

45-4-1212. Exemption from share and deposit insurance.

The corporation shall be exempt from the requirements of §45-4-505 relating to insurance of its shares and deposits.

Acts 1981, ch. 76, § 12.

45-4-1213. Exemption from annual meetings and reserves.

The corporation shall be exempt from the requirements applicable to noncorporate credit unions relating to the date of its annual meetings and reserves.

Acts 1983, ch. 94, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Parts 13-18

[Reserved]